California, session 20252026, SB1290.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 16763 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:16763. (a) The For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Contract records” is limited to records, files, documents, emails, communications, accounts, and data related to a contract with any public entity that are received from, sent to, or communicated with a third party outside the public entity, or would be available under a request pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).(2) “Public entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1100 of the Public Contract Code.(b) The Department of Justice may request to examine all records, files, documents, accounts, and data related to contracts with any public entity, as defined by Section 1100 of the Public Contract Code, that concern a contract amount over one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to identify bid rigging and other violations under California law. The department may request or contract records held by a public entity or to enter any public office or institution in this state and examine any records, files, books, data, papers, or documents contained therein or belonging thereto for the purpose of making the examination. contract records if both of the following are true:(1) The request seeks information reasonably related to an active investigation initiated by the Attorney General to identify bid rigging and other violations of California law concerning the public procurement of goods and services.(2) The contract amount exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).(b)(c) A public entity shall permit the examination under subdivision (a) (b) and, upon demand, shall produce within 30 days, in complete and unredacted form, copies of all books, records, data, contracts, contract proposals, specified electronic communications, including, but not limited to, emails, and papers in its offices and furnish information touching books, papers, contracts, and other matters pertaining to the public entity. contract records.(c)(d) The department shall pay a fee to the public entity limited to the direct cost of duplication under this section, or a statutory fee, if applicable. Upon request, an exact copy shall be provided unless impracticable to do so. The cost of duplication of an electronic record shall be limited to the direct cost of producing a copy of a record in an electronic format.(e) (1) Information and documents obtained under subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be used only for the purpose of identifying bid rigging and other violations of California law related to the public procurement of goods and services.(2) A public entity responding to a request shall not be required to permit examination of, or to produce copies of, documents or information protected by the attorney-client privilege or any other applicable privilege.(d)(f) (1) The department shall maintain the confidentiality of the documents or information received to the greatest extent required by law. law, and at a minimum as if they had been subpoenaed under Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. (2) (A) Information obtained under this section shall not be considered a public record and shall not be disclosed by the department pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).(B) This paragraph does not affect a public entity’s obligation to produce records under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which adds Section 16763 to the Business and Professions Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:In order to facilitate cooperation by public agencies and the expeditious transfer and examination of records, it is necessary that this act limit the public’s right of access to that information. SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which adds Section 16763 to the Business and Professions Code, furthers, within the meaning of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution, the purposes of that constitutional section as it relates to the right of public access to the meetings of local public bodies or the writings of local public officials and local agencies. Pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution, the Legislature makes the following findings:In order to facilitate cooperation by local agencies and the expeditious transfer and examination of records, it is necessary that this act limit the public’s right of access to that information.SEC. 2.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.